Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3405
Committee; members; compensation; expenses.

Members of the committee shall receive no salary, but shall be paid a per diem of twenty-five dollars for each day they are actually and necessarily engaged in the transaction of business, together with expenses incurred while on official business as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1976, LB 514, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 5.
December 31, 2027